New York, session 2025-2026, A7498.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 41.60 to read as follows: 3 § 41.60 Additional expenditures related to retirement benefits. 4 The office for people with developmental disabilities shall annually 5 reimburse licensed not-for-profit corporations, which provide direct 6 care to consumers of services approved by the office for people with 7 developmental disabilities, for the cost of employer contributions to a 8 retirement benefit fund governed by the provisions of the Federal 9 Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended. Such 10 reimbursement shall commence on the first day of April of the calendar 11 year following the submission by such corporation of the federal Inter- 12 nal Revenue Service Form 5500 which documents that such employer 13 contributions were made. Any such corporation may apply to the office 14 for people with developmental disabilities for expedited reimbursement 15 of such employer contributions upon demonstrating to such office that 16 such payments must be made promptly, and that the corporation cannot 17 reasonably make prompt payment. The office for people with developmental 18 disabilities shall not reimburse any amount which exceeds ten percent of 19 the employer's total payroll on December thirty-first of any year in 20 which contributions are made. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 22 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10721-01-5